California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Covered TNCs may form a multicompany committee for purposes of collective bargaining. If covered TNCs do not form a multicompany committee pursuant to this paragraph, then the certified driver bargaining organization may require all covered TNCs to bargain within the certified driver bargaining organization together, and an individual covered TNC shall not object to such a requirement to bargain in concert with other covered TNCs.

(3) A sectoral agreement shall be approved by covered TNCs that includes at least 80 percent of the industry measured by rideshare volume on the most recent quarterly report filed with the board and that includes at least the two largest covered TNCs.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “to negotiate in good faith” means the performance of the mutual obligation of the covered transportation network companies or their agents or
 representatives and the certified driver bargaining organization to meet at reasonable times and negotiate in good faith with respect to subjects within the scope of representation and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached if requested by either party. However, this mutual obligation does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or require the making of a concession.

(c) If the certified driver bargaining organization and covered TNCs reach a recommended
 sectoral agreement for the bargaining unit, the recommended agreement shall be ratified pursuant to the certified driver bargaining organization’s procedures. The recommended agreement shall then be submitted to the board for review and approval or disapproval. If the recommended agreement is not ratified according to the certified driver bargaining organization’s procedures, the certified driver bargaining organization and covered TNCs shall resume
 bargaining.

(d) (1) If there has been no prior sectoral agreement under this chapter, covered TNCs or the certified driver bargaining organization may file with the board, at any time following 210 days after an initial request to bargain, a petition requesting that the board issue an order referring the parties to mediation of their issues. The parties may also jointly file a petition requesting referral to mediation at any time after the commencement of bargaining. Upon receipt of a petition, the board shall promptly refer the parties to mediation.

(2) If the
 parties have not agreed upon a mediator, the board shall, within seven days of receiving the petition, obtain from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service (CSMCS) a list of nine qualified, disinterested mediators who have experience in labor mediation and submit it to the parties. A representative of the covered TNCs and a representative of the certified driver bargaining organization shall alternately strike from the list one of the names. The order of striking shall be determined by lot until one name remains. The remaining person shall be
 designated as the mediator. In the event the parties are unable to select the mediator within 15 days following receipt of the list from the board because a party refuses to strike names, the board shall appoint the mediator from the list provided by CSMCS.

(3) The parties shall have a duty to participate in good faith in mediation.

(4) If the certified driver bargaining organization and the covered TNCs reach a recommended sectoral agreement for the industry through mediation, the approval process described in subdivision (c) shall apply.

(5) Communications and documents exchanged pursuant to mediation
 shall be inadmissible in any official, regulatory, or judicial proceeding, consistent with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9 of the Evidence Code.

(e) (1) Within 30 days after a dispute has been referred to mediation, the parties shall select a prospective arbitrator to resolve the dispute if mediation is unsuccessful. If the parties have not agreed upon an arbitrator within 30 days, the covered TNCs and the certified driver bargaining organization each shall propose three arbitrators to the board and the board shall propose three arbitrators from the American Arbitration Association roster who have at least 10 years of
 experience conducting labor arbitrations in California, have interest arbitration experience, and are members of the National Academy of Arbitrators. The certified driver bargaining organization and the covered TNCs shall select an arbitrator within seven days of receipt of the combined list from the board. The parties may mutually select an arbitrator who is not on the list. If the parties cannot agree on an arbitrator, each side shall alternatively strike from the list one of the names until an arbitrator is chosen by process of elimination. The board shall determine by lot which side shall strike first. If either side refuses to propose arbitrators for the list or to participate in selecting an arbitrator within 15 days following receipt of the list from the board, the board shall appoint the arbitrator from the original list proposed by the board.

(2) If the mediator is unable to achieve agreement between the parties concerning an appropriate resolution within 75 days of appointment of the mediator or within 60 days after the first meeting of the parties with the mediator, whichever occurs first, either the certified driver bargaining organization or the covered TNCs may petition the board to refer the dispute for resolution through arbitration. The parties may also jointly file a petition requesting referral of the dispute to arbitration at any time after the commencement of bargaining. Upon a filing of such a petition, the board shall refer the dispute to the
 arbitrator for resolution.

(3) (A) The arbitrator shall hold hearings on all matters related to the dispute. The parties may be heard and represented by counsel or by other representatives, as the parties may designate. The arbitrator shall determine the order of presentation by the parties and shall have discretion and authority to decide all procedural issues that may be raised. At the mutual request of the parties, the arbitrator may meet
 directly with the parties to attempt to mediate the dispute.

(B) The TNCs and the certified driver bargaining organization shall each be responsible for 50 percent of the cost of the arbitrator or mediator. The board shall have the authority to apportion costs among TNCs based on market share if the TNCs cannot agree to apportion costs among themselves.

(C) The parties may present, either orally or in writing, or both, statements
 of fact, supporting witnesses and other evidence, and arguments of their respective positions.

(D) The arbitrator shall have the authority to require the production of additional oral or written evidence from the parties. The arbitrator shall provide, at the request of either party, that a full and complete record be kept of any hearings, with the cost of the record borne by the requesting party. If such a record is created, it shall be shared with all parties, regardless of the party that paid for it.

(E) Within 90 days of the
 first meeting of the parties with the arbitrator or 105 days after appointment of the arbitrator, whichever occurs first, the arbitrator shall make a just and reasonable determination of the matters in dispute, and shall issue a recommended sectoral agreement that resolves all disputed issues. The time period for the arbitration proceedings may be extended by the arbitrator upon good cause shown, or by agreement, by the parties.

(F) In issuing a recommended sectoral agreement, the arbitrator shall specify the basis for their findings, taking into consideration the following factors:

(i) The positions of the parties.

(ii) The conditions of similar workers.

(iii) Whether the terms of the recommended agreement achieve the policy goals set forth in Section 7470.1, including, but not limited to, the improvement of working
 conditions and the improvement or provision for the prompt resolution of disputes between covered TNCs and TNC drivers.

(iv) If the covered TNCs claim an inability to pay for the certified driver bargaining organization’s demands, the financial ability of the covered TNCs to pay for the requirements set forth in the recommended agreement.

(v) The impact of the recommended agreement on the delivery of services provided by TNCs.

(vi) Whether the recommended agreement would have a discriminatory impact on smaller TNCs or new entrants to the industry.

(vii) Any other factors recommended by the parties that the arbitrator finds to be consistent with this
 chapter.

(G) The sectoral agreement recommended by the arbitrator shall contain all of the following:

(i) Terms on which the parties have mutually agreed.

(ii) Binding recommendations on all minimum subjects set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 7470.13 that have not been waived.

(iii) Nonbinding recommendations on all other matters submitted for dispute resolution within the scope of representation.

(H) After receipt of the recommended sectoral agreement, the covered TNCs shall have 10 days to notify the certified driver bargaining organization as to whether the covered TNCs accept the recommended sectoral agreement in its entirety, including the nonbinding recommendations. If the covered TNCs accept the recommended sectoral agreement in its entirety, the recommended sectoral agreement shall be submitted to the board for review and approval or disapproval.

(I) The certified driver bargaining organization
 and the covered TNCs may also mutually agree to modify the recommended sectoral agreement and submit a modified sectoral agreement, in whole, to the board for review and approval or disapproval within 15 days after receiving the recommended sectoral agreement.

(J) (i) If, within 10 days of receiving the recommended sectoral agreement, the covered TNCs have not accepted the recommended sectoral agreement, and within 15 days of receiving the sectoral agreement the parties have not agreed upon a modified sectoral agreement, the certified driver bargaining organization may, within 20 days of receiving the recommended sectoral agreement, submit the proposed sectoral agreement without the nonbinding recommendations to the board for review and approval. Notwithstanding the submission of the modified sectoral agreement for approval, or the approval of the modified sectoral agreement, the parties shall have a duty to continue to
 bargain in good faith to reach agreement on the subjects addressed by the nonbinding recommendations.

(ii) If the certified driver bargaining organization does not elect to submit a proposed sectoral agreement to the board pursuant to clause (i), the parties shall have a duty to continue to bargain in good faith over the items in dispute to reach agreement on a new sectoral agreement for submission to the board.

(iii) The certified driver bargaining organization and the covered TNCs may, at any time, mutually submit a new proposed sectoral agreement to the board for review and approval or disapproval, and such an agreement may include modifications to any of the terms of the binding recommendations.

(K) The time periods set forth in this section may be extended by mutual agreement of the certified driver bargaining
 organization and the covered TNCs.

(L) For purposes of this section, any decision or action by the covered TNCs means a decision or action approved by covered TNCs that includes at least 80 percent of the industry measured by rideshare volume on the most recent quarterly report filed with the board and that includes at least the two largest covered TNCs.

(f) Following an initial sectoral
 agreement, all subsequent negotiations for all subsequent agreements shall begin at least 180 days before the current agreement expires. For all subsequent agreements, either the covered TNCs or the certified driver bargaining organization may, at any time after 180 days after the commencement of negotiations, petition the board to refer the parties to mediation. Except as provided in this subdivision, the timelines and procedures for mediation and arbitration for subsequent agreements shall be as provided in this section. The terms of a
 sectoral agreement shall remain in effect, including, but not limited to, any grievance and arbitration provisions and any provisions governing the deduction and transmittal of membership dues, until a new agreement is approved by the board.

(g) For purposes of this section, any decision is binding on all covered TNCs if approved by covered TNCs that include at least 80 percent of the industry, as measured by rideshare volume on the most recent quarterly report filed with the board, and that include at least the two largest covered TNCs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.15.

(a) A TNC that was not a covered TNC when a sectoral agreement took effect but whose rideshare volume in a later quarter brings it within the 95-percent threshold identified in Section 7470.5 shall become a covered TNC, and therefore bound by all terms of the sectoral agreement immediately, unless exempted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) A TNC that becomes a covered TNC pursuant to this section shall remain a covered TNC for the remaining term of the sectoral agreement.

(c) (1) If a TNC that would otherwise become a covered TNC under subdivision (a) obtains a preliminary injunction, final court order, or other legal or regulatory order that exempts
 such covered TNC from any provision of the sectoral agreement, that TNC shall not be bound by the enjoined provision, pending final resolution of the litigation, or the resolution of emergency negotiations as provided in this section, whichever is earlier. All other provisions of the agreement shall continue to apply to all covered TNCs.

(2) Within three business days of receiving notice of such injunction or order, the board shall convene the certified driver bargaining organization and all covered TNCs for emergency negotiations aimed solely at revising the provision or provisions deemed unlawful as applied to the objecting TNC. Emergency negotiations under this subdivision shall neither reopen nor impair any agreement terms not directly related to the provision or provisions held unlawful.

(3) Any agreement reached under this subdivision must be approved by covered TNCs that
 include at least 80 percent of the industry measured by rideshare volume on the most recent quarterly report filed with the board and that include at least the two largest covered TNCs, unless the 80-percent requirement is itself adjudged unlawful as to any covered TNC, in which case the revised provision shall require the unanimous agreement of all covered TNCs.

(4) Any agreement resulting from emergency negotiations must be reviewed and approved or disapproved by the board, in accordance with the requirements of Section 7470.17, within 14 calendar days after the end of emergency negotiations.

(5) If emergency negotiations do not produce an agreement approved by the necessary parties for submission to the board within 30 days, either the certified driver bargaining organization or any nonobjecting TNC may rescind the sectoral agreement by notifying the board within 10 days of the
 expiration of the 30-day period. Upon rescission of the sectoral agreement, the certified driver bargaining organization and all covered TNCs shall have a duty to bargain in good faith for a new sectoral agreement pursuant to Section 7470.10. If neither the certified driver bargaining organization nor any nonobjecting TNC rescinds the sectoral agreement, the sectoral agreement shall remain in effect except for any provision or provisions deemed unlawful as applied to the objecting TNC.

(6) If a sectoral agreement is rescinded pursuant to paragraph (5), the certified driver bargaining organization and any covered TNC or group of covered TNCs may enter into an agreement consistent with Section 7470.13 that shall be effective until a new sectoral agreement is approved. That agreement shall be submitted to the board for approval or disapproval pursuant to Section 7470.17 but, upon approval by the board, such an agreement shall only be effective as
 to the TNCs that have approved the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.16.

(a) When a sectoral agreement is in effect, any TNC that is not a covered TNC for purposes of Section 7470.5 may choose to become bound to the sectoral agreement by providing written notice to the board, the certified driver bargaining organization, and the covered TNCs. A TNC that chooses to become bound to a sectoral agreement pursuant to this section shall be bound for the remaining term of the agreement. Such a TNC shall not, on account of its exercise of the option provided by this section, become a covered TNC for purposes of negotiation of subsequent sectoral agreements or coverage by subsequent sectoral agreements.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any TNC that is not a covered TNC nor voluntarily bound by the terms of the sectoral
 agreement as provided by this section to make any statement, advertisement, or imply in any official communication that such TNC is bound by the terms of the sectoral agreement.

(c) During the time that a noncovered TNC is bound by the terms of the sectoral agreement pursuant to this section, the certified driver bargaining organization shall represent the TNC drivers who drive for the noncovered TNC for purposes of this chapter. The noncovered TNC shall have the same obligations as a covered TNC to provide information to the board necessary to administer this chapter and to provide information to the certified driver bargaining organization necessary for representation of the TNC drivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.17.

(a) After a sectoral agreement has been approved by the parties or recommended by an arbitrator, the agreement shall be submitted to the board for approval or disapproval.

(b) The general counsel of the board shall review the proposed agreement to determine whether:

(1) The agreement addresses the mandatory subjects established in subdivision (a) of Section 7470.13 that were not mutually waived.

(2) The agreement does not contain any terms prohibited by subdivision (c) of Section 7470.13.

(3) The agreement advances the public policy goals stated
 in Section 7470.1.

(4) The agreement will not have anticompetitive effects on the industry beyond those contemplated by this act.

(5) The agreement was the product of fair, arm’s-length negotiation or arbitration under the procedures of this chapter.

(c) The general counsel has the right to gather and consider any necessary additional evidence, including by requesting additional information from the certified driver bargaining organization and the covered TNC, to review the proposed agreement.

(d) The general counsel shall issue a recommended determination as to whether the agreement should be approved or disapproved. If the general counsel recommends that the agreement be disapproved, the general counsel shall provide reasons for the disapproval and
 identify any provisions that the general counsel determined were not consistent with the standards in subdivision (b). If the general counsel recommends approval of the agreement, the general counsel shall provide a written opinion identifying the reasons for the approval. Absent good cause, the general counsel shall issue the determination within 60 days of receipt of the recommended agreement.

(e) The general counsel’s recommendation shall be served on the board and the parties to the agreement. Within 21 days of the general counsel’s recommendation, the board shall issue a final order that approves or disapproves the agreement.

(f) If a final order of the board disapproves of the proposed sectoral agreement, the certified driver bargaining organization and covered TNCs shall bargain in good faith to reach agreement on a revised sectoral agreement for submission to the board. If
 the proposed sectoral agreement was recommended by an arbitrator or modified by the parties after an arbitrator recommended a sectoral agreement, either the certified driver bargaining organization or the covered TNCs may request that the board remand the matter to the arbitrator for resolution of any disputes and the issuance of a revised recommended sectoral agreement for submission to the board. A revised agreement shall be submitted to the board for review pursuant to this section.

(g) (1) If the proposed sectoral agreement includes binding terms that were recommended by an arbitrator and not mutually accepted by the certified driver bargaining organization and covered TNCs, the general counsel shall recommend disapproval of the proposed agreement if a party demonstrates that the arbitrator’s recommendations were procured by corruption, fraud, or other undue means, there was corruption by the arbitrator, the rights of
 the party were substantially prejudiced by the misconduct of the arbitrator, or the arbitrator’s recommendation was arbitrary or capricious in light of the record. Absent good cause, the general counsel shall issue the determination within 60 days of receipt of the recommended agreement.

(2) The general counsel’s recommendation pursuant to this subdivision shall be served on the board and the parties to the agreement. Within 21 days of the general counsel’s recommendation, the board shall issue a final order that approves or disapproves the agreement.

(3) If a final order of the board disapproves a proposed agreement pursuant to this subdivision, the parties shall bargain in good faith to reach agreement on a sectoral agreement for submission to the board. Either side may request that the board conduct a new process to select a new arbitrator and refer the parties to arbitration
 pursuant to Section 7470.14.

(h) Upon approval of a sectoral agreement by the final order of the board, the agreement shall be final and binding on the certified driver bargaining organization and the TNC drivers it represents and on all covered TNCs. The terms of the agreement shall thereby become enforceable commitments for each covered TNC to implement with respect to TNC drivers. Each covered TNC shall adhere to the terms as minimum standards for all TNC drivers using its platform in the state for the duration of the agreement. In the event of any conflict between an approved sectoral agreement and a term of service or contract between an individual TNC driver and a covered TNC, the sectoral agreement shall prevail for covered matters, except that nothing in the sectoral agreement shall reduce rights or benefits already secured by law or individual contract.

(i) During the
 term of a sectoral agreement, the agreement may be reopened, amended, or modified by mutual agreement of the certified driver bargaining organization and the covered TNCs. Any such amendments or modifications must be submitted to the board for approval or disapproval pursuant to this section and shall become effective only upon approval of the board.

(j) For purposes of this section, any decision or action by the covered TNCs means a decision or action approved by covered TNCs that includes at least 80 percent of the industry measured by rideshare volume on the most recent quarterly report filed with the board and that includes at least the two largest covered TNCs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.18.

(a) It shall be an unfair practice for a TNC, an agent of a TNC, or a multicompany committee to do any of the following:

(1) Fail or refuse to provide the board with a list containing the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 7470.6
 or subdivision (c) of Section 7470.9 or any other information required by this act, or knowingly provide an inaccurate list or inaccurate information.

(2) Fail or refuse to negotiate in good faith with a certified driver bargaining organization, as required by this act.

(3) Fail or refuse to provide a certified driver bargaining organization with information required by the organization that is relevant and necessary in discharging its representational duties or in exercising its right to represent TNC drivers regarding terms and conditions of work within the scope of
 representation, as established in this act.

(4) Dominate or interfere with the formation, existence, or administration of any TNC driver organization, or contribute financial or other support to any such organization, whether directly or indirectly, unless required by this act or other law, by any regulations implementing this act or other law, or as a result of a
 sectoral agreement approved by the
 board, including, but not limited to, by doing any of the following:

(A) Participating or assisting in, supervising, or controlling the initiation or creation of any such organization or the meetings, management, operation, elections, or formulation or amendment of the organization’s constitution, rules, or policies.

(B) Offering incentives to TNC drivers to join any such organization.

(C) Donating free services, equipment, materials, offices, meeting space, or anything else of value for use by any such organization, unless those items have been negotiated as a benefit or service for TNC drivers in a
 sectoral agreement approved by the
 board. However, a covered TNC may permit TNC drivers to perform representational work protected under this act during working hours without loss of time or may allow agents of a certified driver bargaining organization to meet with drivers on its premises or communicate with TNC drivers using the covered TNC’s platform.

(5) Require a TNC driver to join any company union or TNC driver organization or requiring a TNC driver to refrain from forming, joining, or assisting a TNC driver organization of their choice.

(6) Encourage or discourage membership in
 any company union or in any TNC driver organization by discriminating with regard to any term or condition of work.

(7) Discharge, deactivate, or otherwise discriminate with regard to the ability of a TNC driver to obtain rides, or otherwise discriminate against a TNC driver, because they have signed or filed any affidavit, petition, or complaint under this chapter, have given any information or testimony under this chapter, have participated or declined to participate in a TNC driver organization, or have exercised any rights under this chapter.

(8) Distribute or circulate any blacklist of individuals exercising any right created or confirmed by this chapter or of members of a TNC driver organization, or inform any person of the exercise by any individual of that right or
 of the membership of any individual of a TNC driver organization for the purpose of preventing those blacklisted or named individuals from obtaining or retaining opportunities for remuneration.

(9) Interfere with, restrain, or coerce TNC drivers in the exercise of rights guaranteed by Section 7470.3 or in any other way violate this chapter.

(b) It shall be an unfair practice for a TNC driver organization or its agents to do any of the following:

(1) Restrain or coerce either of the following:

(A) TNC drivers in the exercise of rights guaranteed in Section 7470.3. This subparagraph shall not impair the right of a TNC driver organization or certified driver bargaining organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition or retention of membership therein or with respect to TNC drivers’ financial contributions to a TNC driver organization or a certified
 driver bargaining organization.

(B) A covered TNC or multicompany committee in its selection of representatives for purposes of bargaining or the adjustment of grievances.

(2) Cause or attempt to cause a TNC or its agent or representative to violate subdivision (a).

(3) Fail or refuse to negotiate in good faith with a covered TNC or multicompany committee as required by this chapter, provided it is the certified driver bargaining organization.

(4) Fail or refuse to provide information requested by a covered TNC or its representative that is relevant and necessary for purposes of bargaining regarding terms and conditions of work within the scope of representation, as established by this chapter, provided that it is the certified driver bargaining organization.

(5) Fail or refuse to fulfill its duty of fair representation toward TNC drivers where it is the certified driver bargaining organization by acts or omissions that are arbitrary, discriminatory, or in bad faith.

(c) The unfair
 practice procedures in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31001) of Division 3 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations shall apply for purposes of this chapter, except to the extent that the board has adopted procedures specific to this act.

(d) A party filing an unfair practice charge under this section may petition the board to seek injunctive relief on behalf of the charging party, pending a decision on the merits of the charge by the board. The board may also petition the appropriate superior court for that relief in accordance with Section
 3563 of the Government Code or any regulation adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.19.

Any meeting of a mediator or arbitrator with any party or group or both parties or groups to the negotiations process and the mediation and arbitration processes set forth in Section 7470.14 is exempt from the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.20.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, or application of this chapter is for any reason held to be invalid by a decision of any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter. The people of the State of California hereby declare that they would have adopted this chapter and each and every portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, and application not declared invalid or unconstitutional without regard to whether any other portion of this chapter or application thereof would be subsequently declared invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.21.

The board may also adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and regulations necessary to carry out this chapter as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption, amendment, or repeal of regulations pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Repossessors [7500. - 7511.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [7500. - 7500.3.]

7500.

This chapter of the Business and Professions Code constitutes the chapter on repossessors. It may be cited as the “Collateral Recovery Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7500.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Advertisement” means any written or printed communication, including a directory listing, except a free telephone directory listing that does not allow space for a license number.

(b) “Assignment” or “repossession order” means any written authorization by the legal owner, lienholder, lessor, lessee, or registered owner, or the agent of any of them, to skip trace, locate, or repossess any collateral, including, but not limited to, collateral registered under the Vehicle Code that is subject to a security agreement that contains a repossession clause. “Assignment” or “repossession order” also means any written authorization by an employer to recover any collateral entrusted to an employee or
 former employee in possession of the collateral. A photocopy of an assignment or repossession order, facsimile copy of an assignment or repossession order, or electronic format of an assignment or repossession order shall have the same force and effect as an original written assignment or repossession order.

(c) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(d) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(e) “Collateral” means any specific vehicle, trailer, boat, recreational vehicle, motor home, appliance, or other property that is subject to a security agreement.

(f) “Combustibles” means any substances or articles that are capable of undergoing combustion or catching fire, or that are flammable, if
 retained.

(g) “Dangerous drugs” means any controlled substances as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Deadly weapon” means and includes any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a firearm.

(i) “Debtor” means any person obligated under a security agreement.

(j) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(k) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(l) “Electronic format” includes, but is not limited to, a text message, email, or internet posting.

(m) “Health hazard” means any personal effects that if retained would produce an unsanitary or unhealthful condition, or which might damage other personal effects.

(n) “Legal owner” means a person holding any of the following:

(1) A security interest in any collateral if the collateral is subject to a security agreement.

(2) A lien against any collateral.

(3) An assignment or a repossession order.

(4) An interest in any collateral that is subject to a lease agreement or on an assignment or repossession order as the legal owner.

(o) “Licensee” means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, or
 corporation licensed under this chapter as a repossession agency.

(p) “Multiple licensee” means a repossession agency holding more than one repossession license under this chapter, with one fictitious trade style and ownership, conducting repossession business from additional licensed locations other than the location shown on the original license.

(q) “Person” includes any individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.

(r) “Personal effects” means any property that is not the property of the legal owner and is not listed on the repossession assignment.

(s) “Private building” means and includes any dwelling, outbuilding, or other enclosed structure.

(t) “Qualified
 certificate holder” or “qualified manager” is a person who possesses a valid qualification certificate in accordance with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 7504) and is in active control or management of, and who is a director of, the licensee’s place of business.

(u) “Registered owner” means the individual listed in the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles, on a conditional sales contract, or on an assignment or a repossession order, as the registered owner.

(v) “Registrant” means a person registered under this chapter.

(w) “Repossession” means any of the following:

(1) When the repossessor gains entry to the collateral.

(2) The collateral becomes connected to a
 tow truck or to a repossessor’s tow vehicle.

(3) The repossessor moves the entire collateral present.

(4) The repossessor gains control of the collateral.

(5) The repossessor disconnects any part of the collateral from any surface where it is mounted or attached.

(x) “Secured area” means and includes any fenced and locked area.

(y) “Security agreement” means an obligation, pledge, mortgage, chattel mortgage, lease agreement, deposit, or lien, given by a debtor as security for payment or performance of a debt, by furnishing the creditor with a recourse to be used in case of failure in the principal obligation. “Security agreement” also includes a bailment where an employer-employee
 relationship exists or existed between the bailor and the bailee.

(z) “Services” means any duty or labor to be rendered by one person for another.

(aa) “Violent act” means any act that results in bodily harm or injury to any party involved during the repossession up until the time the repossessor is back in their vehicle.

(ab) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 418 of the Statutes of 2006 shall not be deemed to exempt any person from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (AB 913)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7500.2.

(a) A repossession agency means and includes any person who, for any consideration whatsoever, engages in business or accepts employment to locate or recover collateral, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, including, but not limited to, collateral registered under the provisions of the Vehicle Code which is subject to a security agreement, except for any person registered pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 7506).

(b) A repossession agency licensed pursuant to this chapter shall only transact business with another person or entity as an independent contractor.

(c) A repossession agency shall not allow a
 person or entity other than the qualified certificate holder, as provided in Section 7505.1, or the owner or officer of the repossession agency, to manage the day-to-day operations, operate, control, or transact business covered by this act, except as provided in Section 7503.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (AB 2503)   Effective September 17, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7500.3.

(a) A repossession agency shall not include any of the following:

(1) Any bank subject to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation of the State of California under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code or the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States.

(2) Any person organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate to make loans pursuant to the laws of this state or the United States who is subject to supervision by any official or agency of this state or the United States.

(3) An attorney at law in performing their duties as an attorney at law.

(4) The legal owner of collateral that is subject to a security agreement or a bona fide employee employed exclusively and regularly by the legal owner of collateral that is subject to a security agreement. With regard to collateral subject to registration under the Vehicle Code, the legal owner shall be the legal owner listed on the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles or the seller or lessor named on a valid conditional sales contract or rental or lease agreement if the seller or lessor is a licensed vehicle dealer as defined in Section 285 of the Vehicle Code.
